Hawaii statutes.
[§669-13] Restrictions as to owner
of property. This part shall not apply to any de minimis structure
position discrepancy on public lands, as defined in section 171-2, or to such
encroaching improvements incident to shoreline boundaries. If real property
subject to this section is owned by a county, any improvement within a de
minimis structure position discrepancy shall be removed at the expense of the
property owner who constructed the improvement, or the property owner's
successor in interest, upon notice, in accordance with the respective county
procedures or ordinances. [L 1997, c 131, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next